Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.210

Violation of chapter unfair or deceptive practice under RCW 19.86.020.

A violation of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter affects the public interest and is an unfair or deceptive act or practice in violation of RCW 19.86.020 of the consumer protection act. The remedies and sanctions provided by this section shall not preclude application of other remedies and sanctions.

[ 1986 c 299 s 21.]